Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE B. HEALTH PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 52A. SICKLE CELL DISEASE CARE EDUCATION AND TREATMENT

Sec. 52A.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "sickle cell task force" means the sickle cell task force established under Chapter 52.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (H.B. 1488), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 52A.002. EMERGENCY AND PRIMARY CARE MEDICINE GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION PROGRAM CURRICULUM. (a) In this section, "graduate medical education program" and "medical school" have the meanings assigned by Section 58A.001, Education Code.

(b) A medical school or graduate medical education program in this state that offers an emergency medicine, family medicine, internal medicine, obstetrics, or pediatrics residency program shall examine and, to the extent possible, incorporate in the curriculum requirements for the program education focused on sickle cell disease and sickle cell trait. The medical school or graduate medical education program may enter into agreements as necessary for the purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (H.B. 1488), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 52A.003. INFORMATION FOR PUBLIC SCHOOL DISTRICT PERSONNEL. (a) To the extent possible, the Texas Education Agency in collaboration with sickle cell disease community-based organizations shall provide information on sickle cell disease and sickle cell trait to public school districts and district staff, including school nurses, teachers, and coaches.

(b) The commission in collaboration with the sickle cell task force shall explore methods for improving sickle cell disease education and awareness within the public school system and provide recommendations to the Texas Education Agency on the improvement methods.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (H.B. 1488), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.